Utah statutes.
49-23-502.   Death of married members -- Service retirement benefits to
surviving spouse.
(1)  As used in this section, "member's full allowance" means an Option Three
allowance calculated under Section 49-23-304 without an actuarial reduction.
(2)  Upon the request of a deceased member's lawful spouse at the time of the
member's death, the deceased member is considered to have retired under Option
Three on the first day of the month following the month in which the member
died if the following requirements are met:
(a)  the member has:
(i)  15 or more years of service credit;
(ii)  attained age 62 with 10 or more years of service credit; or
(iii)  attained age 65 with four or more years of service credit; and
(b)  the member dies leaving a spouse to whom the member has been married at
least six months immediately prior to the death date.
(3)  The spouse who requests a benefit under this section shall apply in
writing to the office.  The allowance shall begin on the first day of the
month:
(a)  following the month in which the member died, if the application is
received by the office within 90 days of the member's death; or
(b)  in which the application is received by the office.
(4)  The allowance payable to a surviving spouse under Subsection (2) is:
(a)  if the member has 25 or more years of service credit at the time of
death, the surviving spouse shall receive the member's full allowance;
(b)  if the member has between 20-24 years of service credit and is not age 60
or older at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive 2/3 of the
member's full allowance;
(c)  if the member has between 15-19 years of service credit and is not age 62
or older at the time of death, the surviving spouse shall receive 1/3 of the
member's full allowance; or
(d)  if the member is age 60 or older with 20 or more years of service credit,
age 62 or older with 10 or more years of service credit, or age 65 or older
with four or more years of service credit at the time of death, the surviving
spouse shall receive an Option Three benefit with actuarial reductions.
(5)  Except for a return of member contributions, benefits payable under this
section are retirement benefits and shall be paid in addition to any other
payments made under Section 49-23-501 and shall constitute a full and final
settlement of the claim of the spouse or any other beneficiary filing a claim
for benefits under Section 49-23-501.
